California statutes. Civil Code
A condition subsequent is one referring to a future event, upon the happening of which the obligation becomes no longer binding upon the other party, if he chooses to avail himself of the condition.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1439.

Before any party to an obligation can require another party to perform any act under it, he must fulfill all conditions precedent thereto imposed upon himself; and must be able and offer to fulfill all conditions concurrent so imposed upon him on the like fulfillment by the other party, except as provided by the next section.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1440.

If a party to an obligation gives notice to another, before the latter is in default, that he will not perform the same upon his part, and does not retract such notice before the time at which performance upon his part is due, such other party is entitled to enforce the obligation without previously performing or offering to perform any conditions upon his part in favor of the former party.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1441.

A condition in a contract, the fulfillment of which is impossible or unlawful, within the meaning of the Article on the Object of Contracts, or which is repugnant to the nature of the interest created by the contract, is void.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1442.

A condition involving a forfeiture must be strictly interpreted against the party for whose benefit it is created.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Alternative Obligations [1448. - 1451.]

1448.

If an obligation requires the performance of one of two acts, in the alternative, the party required to perform has the right of selection, unless it is otherwise provided by the terms of the obligation.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1449.

If the party having the right of selection between alternative acts does not give notice of his selection to the other party within the time, if any, fixed by the obligation for that purpose, or, if none is so fixed, before the time at which the obligation ought to be performed, the right of selection passes to the other party.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1450.

The party having the right of selection between alternative acts must select one of them in its entirety, and cannot select part of one and part of another without the consent of the other party.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1451.

If one of the alternative acts required by an obligation is such as the law will not enforce, or becomes unlawful, or impossible of performance, the obligation is to be interpreted as though the other stood alone.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 3. TRANSFER OF OBLIGATIONS [1457. - 1471.]

1457.

The burden of an obligation may be transferred with the consent of the party entitled to its benefit, but not otherwise, except as provided by Section 1466.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1458.

A right arising out of an obligation is the property of the person to whom it is due, and may be transferred as such.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1459.

A non-negotiable written contract for the payment of money or personal property may be transferred by indorsement, in like manner with negotiable instruments. Such indorsement shall transfer all the rights of the assignor under the instrument to the assignee, subject to all equities and defenses existing in favor of the maker at the time of the indorsement.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1459.5.

(a) A plaintiff who prevails on a cause of action against a defendant named pursuant to Part 433 of Title 16 of the Code of Federal Regulations or any successor thereto, or pursuant to the contractual language required by that part or any successor thereto, may claim attorney’s fees, costs, and expenses from that defendant to the fullest extent permissible if the plaintiff had prevailed on that cause of action against the seller.

(b) Any waiver of subdivision (a) is contrary to public policy and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 853, Sec. 10.   (AB 3281)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1460.

Certain covenants, contained in grants of estates in real property, are appurtenant to such estates, and pass with them, so as to bind the assigns of the covenantor and to vest in the assigns of the covenantee, in the same manner as if they had personally entered into them. Such convenants are said to run with the land.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1461.

The only covenants which run with the land are those specified in this Title, and those which are incidental thereto.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1462.

Every covenant contained in a grant of an estate in real property, which is made for the direct benefit of the property, or some part of it then in existence, runs with the land.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.

The last section includes covenants “of warranty,” “for quiet enjoyment,” or for further assurance on the part of a grantor, and covenants for the payment of rent, or of taxes or assessments upon the land, on the part of a grantee.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1465.

A covenant running with the land binds those only who acquire the whole estate of the covenantor in some part of the property.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1466.

No one, merely by reason of having acquired an estate subject to a covenant running with the land, is liable for a breach of the covenant before he acquired the estate, or after he has parted with it or ceased to enjoy its benefits.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1467.

Where several persons, holding by several titles, are subject to the burden or entitled to the benefit of a covenant running with the land, it must be apportioned among them according to the value of the property subject to it held by them respectively, if such value can be ascertained, and if not, then according to their respective interests in point of quantity.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1468.

Each covenant, made by an owner of land with the owner of other land or made by a grantor of land with the grantee of land conveyed, or made by the grantee of land conveyed with the grantor thereof, to do or refrain from doing some act on his own land, which doing or refraining is expressed to be for the benefit of the land of the convenantee, runs with both the land owned by or granted to the covenantor and the land owned by or granted to the covenantee and shall, except as provided by Section 1466, or as specifically provided in the instrument creating such covenant, and notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1465, benefit or be binding upon each successive owner,
 during his ownership, of any portion of such land affected thereby and upon each person having any interest therein derived through any owner thereof where all of the following requirements are met:

(a) The land of the covenantor which is to be affected by such covenants, and the land of covenantee to be benefited, are particularly described in the instrument containing such covenants;

(b) Such successive owners of the land are in such instrument expressed to be bound thereby for the benefit of the land owned by, granted by, or granted to the covenantee;

(c) Each such act relates to the use, repair, maintenance or improvement of, or payment of taxes and assessments on, such land or some part thereof, or if the land owned by or granted to each consists of undivided interests in the same parcel or parcels, the
 suspension of the right of partition or sale in lieu of partition for a period which is reasonable in relation to the purpose of the covenant;

(d) The instrument containing such covenants is recorded in the office of the recorder of each county in which such land or some part thereof is situated.

Where several persons are subject to the burden of any such covenant, it shall be apportioned among them pursuant to Section 1467, except that where only a portion of such land is so affected thereby, such apportionment shall be only among the several owners of such portion. This section shall apply to the mortgagee, trustee or beneficiary of a mortgage or deed of trust upon such land or any part thereof while but only while he, in such capacity, is in possession thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 474.)
-------------------------------------------

1469.

Each covenant made by the lessor in a lease of real property to do any act or acts on other real property which is owned by the lessor and is contiguous (except for intervening public streets, alleys or sidewalks) to the real property demised to the lessee shall, except as provided by Section 1466, be binding upon each successive owner, during his ownership, of any portion of such contiguous real property affected thereby where all of the following requirements are met:

(a) Such contiguous real property is particularly described in the lease;

(b) Such successive owners are in the lease expressed to be bound thereby for the benefit of the demised real property;

(c) Each such act relates to the use, repair, maintenance or improvement of, or payment of taxes and assessments on, such contiguous real property or some part thereof;

(d) The lease is recorded in the same manner as grants of real property, in the office of the recorder of each county in which such contiguous real property or some part thereof is situate. Such lease shall include the description of any such contiguous land described in any unrecorded instrument, the contents of which unrecorded instrument are incorporated by reference in such recorded lease. 

Where several persons are subject to the burden of any such covenant, it shall be apportioned among them pursuant to Section 1467, except that where
 only a portion of such contiguous real property is so affected thereby, such apportionment shall be only among the several owners of such portion. This section shall apply to the mortgagee, trustee or beneficiary of a mortgage or deed of trust upon such contiguous real property or any part thereof while but only while he, in such capacity, is in possession thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1502.)
-------------------------------------------

1470.

Each covenant made by the lessor in a lease of real property not to use or permit to be used contrary to the terms of such lease any other real property which is owned by the lessor and is contiguous (except for intervening public streets, alleys or sidewalks) to the real property demised to the lessee shall, except as provided by Section 1466, be binding upon each successive owner, during his ownership, of any portion of such contiguous real property affected thereby and upon each person having any interest therein derived through any owner thereof where all of the following requirements are met:

(a) Such
 contiguous real property is particularly described in the lease;

(b) Such successive owners and persons having any such interest are in the lease expressed to be bound thereby for the benefit of the demised real property; 

(c) The lease is recorded in the same manner as grants of real property, in the office of the recorder of each county in which such contiguous real property or some part thereof is situate. Such lease shall include therein the description of any such contiguous land described in any unrecorded instrument, the contents of which unrecorded instrument are incorporated by reference in such recorded lease.

Where several persons are subject to the burden of any such covenant, it shall be apportioned among them pursuant to Section 1467, except that where only a portion of such contiguous real property is so affected thereby,
 such apportionment shall be only among the several owners of, and persons having any such interest in, such portion. This section shall apply to the mortgagee, trustee or beneficiary of a mortgage or deed of trust upon such contiguous real property or any part thereof while and only while he, in such capacity, is in possession thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2054.)
-------------------------------------------

1471.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 1468 or any other provision of law, a covenant made by an owner of land or by the grantee of land to do or refrain from doing some act on his or her own land, which doing or refraining is expressed to be for the benefit of the covenantee, regardless of whether or not it is for the benefit of land owned by the covenantee, shall run with the land owned by or granted to the covenantor if all the following requirements are met:

(1) The land of the
 covenantor that is to be affected by the covenant is particularly described in the instrument containing the covenant.

(2) The successive owners of the land are expressed to be bound thereby for the benefit of the covenantee in the instrument containing the covenant.

(3) Each act that the owner or grantee will do or refrain from doing relates to the use of land and each act is reasonably necessary to protect present or future human health or safety or the environment as a result of the presence on the land of hazardous materials, as defined in Section 25260 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) The instrument containing the covenant is recorded in the office of the recorder of each county in which the land or some portion thereof is situated and the instrument includes in its title the words: “Environmental
 Restriction.”

(b) Except as provided by Section 1466 or as specifically provided in the instrument creating a covenant made pursuant to this section, the covenant shall be binding upon each successive owner, during his or her ownership, of any portion of the land affected thereby and upon each person having any interest therein derived through any owner thereof.

(c) If several persons are subject to the burden of a covenant recorded pursuant to this section, it shall be apportioned among them pursuant to Section 1467, except if only a portion of the land is so affected thereby, the apportionment shall be only among the several owners of that portion. 

(d) This section shall apply to the mortgagee, trustee, or beneficiary of a mortgage or deed of trust upon the land or any part thereof while, but only while, he or
 she, in that capacity, is in possession thereof.

(e) (1) If an instrument containing a covenant is recorded pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) as an “Environmental Restriction,” in accordance with this section, the office of the recorder of the county may send a certified copy of the instrument to the California Environmental Protection Agency, for posting on its Web site, for informational purposes only, pursuant to Section 57012 of the Health and Safety Code, unless the instrument indicates that it is required by a board or department specified in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (d) of Section 57012 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law, the office of the recorder of the county and any of its employees shall not be subject to any liability under any state law or in any action for damages if the
 office of the recorder does not send a certified copy of the instrument pursuant to paragraph (1).

(f) The office of the recorder of the county may assess a reasonable fee, as determined by resolution of its governing body, to cover the costs of taking the action authorized by subdivision (e).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 592, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 4. EXTINCTION OF OBLIGATIONS [1473. - 1543.]



  CHAPTER 1. Performance [1473. - [1479.]]

1473.

Full performance of an obligation, by the party whose duty it is to perform it, or by any other person on his behalf, and with his assent, if accepted by the creditor, extinguishes it.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1474.

Performance of an obligation, by one of several persons who are jointly liable under it, extinguishes the liability of all.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1475.

An obligation in favor of several persons is extinguished by performance rendered to any of them, except in the case of a deposit made by owners in common, or in joint ownership, which is regulated by the Title on Deposit.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1476.

If a creditor, or any one of two or more joint creditors, at any time directs the debtor to perform his obligation in a particular manner, the obligation is extinguished by performance in that manner, even though the creditor does not receive the benefit of such performance.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1477.

A partial performance of an indivisible obligation extinguishes a corresponding proportion thereof, if the benefit of such performance is voluntarily retained by the creditor, but not otherwise. If such partial performance is of such a nature that the creditor cannot avoid retaining it without injuring his own property, his retention thereof is not presumed to be voluntary.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1478.

Performance of an obligation for the delivery of money only, is called payment.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

[1479.]

Section Fourteen Hundred and Seventy-nine. Where a debtor, under several obligations to another, does an act, by way of performance, in whole or in part, which is equally applicable to two or more of such obligations, such performance must be applied as follows:One—If, at the time of performance, the intention or desire of the debtor that such performance should be applied to the extinction of any particular obligation, be manifested to the creditor, it must be so applied.

Two—If no such application be then made, the creditor,
within a reasonable time after such performance, may apply it toward the extinction of any obligation, performance of which was due to him from the debtor at the time of such performance; except that if similar obligations were due to him both individually and as a trustee, he must, unless otherwise directed by the debtor, apply the performance to the extinction of all such obligations in equal proportion; and an application once made by the creditor cannot be rescinded without the consent of [the] debtor.

Three—If neither party makes such application within the time prescribed herein, the performance must be applied to the extinction of obligations in the following order; and, if there be more than one obligation of a particular class, to the extinction of all in that class, ratably:

1. Of interest due at the time of the performance.

2. Of principal due at that time.

3. Of the obligation earliest in date of maturity.

4. Of an obligation not secured by a lien or collateral undertaking.

5. Of an obligation secured by a lien or collateral undertaking.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Offer of Performance [1485. - 1505.]

1485.

An obligation is extinguished by an offer of performance, made in conformity to the rules herein prescribed, and with intent to extinguish the obligation.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1486.

An offer of partial performance is of no effect.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1487.

An offer of performance must be made by the debtor, or by some person on his behalf and with his assent.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

[1488.]

Section Fourteen Hundred and Eighty-eight. An offer of performance must be made to the creditor, or to any one of two or more joint creditors, or to a person authorized by one or more of them to receive or collect what is due under the obligation, if such creditor or authorized person is present at the place where the offer may be made; and if not, wherever the creditor may be found.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

1489.

In the absence of an express provision to the contrary, an offer of performance may be made, at the option of the debtor:

1. At any place appointed by the creditor; or,

2. Wherever the person to whom the offer ought to be made can be found; or,

3. If such person cannot, with reasonable diligence, be found within this State, and within a reasonable distance from his residence or place of business, or if he evades the debtor, then at his residence or place of business, if the same can, with
reasonable diligence, be found within the State; or,

4. If this cannot be done, then at any place within this State.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1490.

Where an obligation fixes a time for its performance, an offer of performance must be made at that time, within reasonable hours, and not before nor afterwards.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1491.

Where an obligation does not fix the time for its performance, an offer of performance may be made at any time before the debtor, upon a reasonable demand, has refused to perform.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1492.

Where delay in performance is capable of exact and entire compensation, and time has not been expressly declared to be of the essence of the obligation, an offer of performance, accompanied with an offer of such compensation, may be made at any time after it is due, but without prejudice to any rights acquired by the creditor, or by any other person, in the meantime.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1493.

An offer of performance must be made in good faith, and in such manner as is most likely, under the circumstances, to benefit the creditor.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1494.

An offer of performance must be free from any conditions which the creditor is not bound, on his part, to perform.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1495.

An offer of performance is of no effect if the person making it is not able and willing to perform according to the offer.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1496.

The thing to be delivered, if any, need not in any case be actually produced, upon an offer of performance, unless the offer is accepted.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1497.

A thing, when offered by way of performance, must not be mixed with other things from which it cannot be separated immediately and without difficulty.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1498.

When a debtor is entitled to the performance of a condition precedent to, or concurrent with, performance on his part, he may make his offer to depend upon the due performance of such condition.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1499.

A debtor has a right to require from his creditor a written receipt for any property delivered in performance of his obligation.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1500.

An obligation for the payment of money is extinguished by a due offer of payment, if the amount is immediately deposited in the name of the creditor, with some bank or savings and loan association within this state, of good repute, and notice thereof is given to the creditor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 632, Sec. 1.   Effective September 23, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

1501.

All objections to the mode of an offer of performance, which the creditor has an opportunity to state at the time to the person making the offer, and which could be then obviated by him, are waived by the creditor, if not then stated.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1502.

The title to a thing duly offered in performance of an obligation passes to the creditor, if the debtor at the time signifies his intention to that effect.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1503.

The person offering a thing, other than money, by way of performance, must, if he means to treat it as belonging to the creditor, retain it as a depositary for hire, until the creditor accepts it, or until he has given reasonable notice to the creditor that he will retain it no longer, and, if with reasonable diligence he can find a suitable depositary therefor, until he has deposited it with such person.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1504.

An offer of payment or other performance, duly made, though the title to the thing offered be not transferred to the creditor, stops the running of interest on the obligation, and has the same effect upon all its incidents as a performance thereof.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1505.

If anything is given to a creditor by way of performance, which he refuses to accept as such, he is not bound to return it without demand; but if he retains it, he is a gratuitous depositary thereof.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Prevention of Performance or Offer [1511. - 1515.]

1511.

The want of performance of an obligation, or of an offer of performance, in whole or in part, or any delay therein, is excused by the following causes, to the extent to which they operate:

1. When such performance or offer is prevented or delayed by the act of the creditor, or by the operation of law, even though there may have been a stipulation that this shall not be an excuse; however, the parties may expressly require in a contract that the party relying on the provisions of this paragraph give written notice to the other party or parties, within a reasonable time after the occurrence of the event
excusing performance, of an intention to claim an extension of time or of an intention to bring suit or of any other similar or related intent, provided the requirement of such notice is reasonable and just;

2. When it is prevented or delayed by an irresistible, superhuman cause, or by the act of public enemies of this state or of the United States, unless the parties have expressly agreed to the contrary; or,

3. When the debtor is induced not to make it, by any act of the creditor intended or naturally tending to have that effect, done at or before the time at which such performance or offer may be made, and not rescinded before that time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1730.)
-------------------------------------------

[1512.]

Section Fifteen Hundred and Twelve. If the performance of an obligation be prevented by the creditor, the debtor is entitled to all the benefits which he would have obtained if it had been performed by both parties.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

1514.

If performance of an obligation is prevented by any cause excusing performance, other than the act of the creditor, the debtor is entitled to a ratable proportion of the consideration to which he would have been entitled upon full performance, according to the benefit which the creditor receives from the actual performance.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1515.

A refusal by a creditor to accept performance, made before an offer thereof, is equivalent to an offer and refusal, unless, before performance is actually due, he gives notice to the debtor of his willingness to accept it.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Accord and Satisfaction [[1521.] - 1526.]

[1521.]

Section Fifteen Hundred and Twenty-one. An accord is an agreement to accept, in extinction of an obligation, something different from or less than that to which the person agreeing to accept is entitled.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

1522.

Though the parties to an accord are bound to execute it, yet it does not extinguish the obligation until it is fully executed.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1523.

Acceptance, by the creditor, of the consideration of an accord extinguishes the obligation, and is called satisfaction.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

[1524.]

Section Fifteen Hundred and Twenty-four. Part performance of an obligation, either before or after a breach thereof, when expressly accepted by the creditor in writing, in satisfaction, or rendered in pursuance of an agreement in writing for that purpose, though without any new consideration, extinguishes the obligation.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

1525.

It is the public policy of this State, in the best interests of the taxpayer and of the litigant, to encourage fair dealing and to promote justice by reducing litigated matters to the lowest level of jurisdiction.

In case of a dispute over total money due on a contract and it is conceded by the parties that part of the money is due, the debtor may pay, without condition, the amount conceded to be due, leaving to the other party all remedies to which he might otherwise be entitled as to any balance claimed.

If any conditions are attached to the payment, this section shall not be deemed to
have limited the remedies available to the other party under other provisions of law on the original amount claimed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

1526.

(a) Where a claim is disputed or unliquidated and a check or draft is tendered by the debtor in settlement thereof in full discharge of the claim, and the words “payment in full” or other words of similar meaning are notated on the check or draft, the acceptance of the check or draft does not constitute an accord and satisfaction if the creditor protests against accepting the tender in full payment by striking out or otherwise deleting that notation or if the acceptance of the check or draft was inadvertent or without knowledge of the notation.

(b) Notwithstanding
subdivision (a), the acceptance of a check or draft constitutes an accord and satisfaction if a check or draft is tendered pursuant to a composition or extension agreement between a debtor and its creditors, and pursuant to that composition or extension agreement, all creditors of the same class are accorded similar treatment, and the creditor receives the check or draft with knowledge of the restriction.

A creditor shall be conclusively presumed to have knowledge of the restriction if a creditor either:

(1) Has, previous to the receipt of the check or draft, executed a written consent to the composition or extension agreement.

(2) Has been given, not less than 15 days nor more than 90 days prior to receipt of the check or draft, notice, in writing, that a check or draft will be tendered with a restrictive endorsement and that acceptance
and cashing of the check or draft will constitute an accord and satisfaction.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the acceptance of a check or draft by a creditor constitutes an accord and satisfaction when the check or draft is issued pursuant to or in conjunction with a release of a claim.

(d) For the purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), mailing the notice by first-class mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the address shown for the creditor on the debtor’s books or such other address as the creditor may designate in writing constitutes notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1268, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Novation [1530. - [1533.]]

1530.

Novation is the substitution of a new obligation for an existing one.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1531.

Novation is made:

1. By the substitution of a new obligation between the same parties, with intent to extinguish the old obligation;

2. By the substitution of a new debtor in place of the old one, with intent to release the latter; or,

3. By the substitution of a new creditor in place of the old one, with intent to transfer the rights of the latter to the former.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1532.

Novation is made by contract, and is subject to all the rules concerning contracts in general.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

[1533.]

Section Fifteen Hundred and Thirty-three. When the obligation of a third person, or an order upon such person is accepted in satisfaction, the creditor may rescind such (such) acceptance if the debtor prevents such person from complying with the order, or from fulfilling the obligation; or if, at the time the obligation or order is received, such person is insolvent, and this fact is unknown to the creditor, or if, before the creditor can with reasonable diligence present the order to the person upon whom it is given, he becomes insolvent.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Release [1541. - 1543.]

1541.

An obligation is extinguished by a release therefrom given to the debtor or the released party by the creditor or releasing party, upon a new consideration, or in writing, with or without new consideration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 157, Sec. 1.   (SB 1431)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1542.

A general release does not extend to claims that the creditor or releasing party does not know or suspect to exist in his or her favor at the time of executing the release and that, if known by him or her, would have materially affected his or her settlement with the debtor or released party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 157, Sec. 2.   (SB 1431)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1542.1.

Notwithstanding Section 1542, a provider of health care, as defined in Section 56.05, or its officers, employees, agents, or subcontractors, shall release the state and its officers, employees, and agents, from any claim arising from the defense of the provider of health care by the Attorney General, or other legal counsel provided by the state pursuant to Section 12511.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 749, Sec. 2.   Effective October 10, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1543.

A release of one of two or more joint debtors does not extinguish the obligations of any of the others, unless they are mere guarantors; nor does it affect their right to contribution from him or her, except as provided in Section 877 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 677, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. CONTRACTS [1549. - 1701.]



  TITLE 1. NATURE OF A CONTRACT [1549. - 1615.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definition [1549. - 1550.5.]

1549.

A contract is an agreement to do or not to do a certain thing.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1550.

It is essential to the existence of a contract that there should be:

1. Parties capable of contracting;

2. Their consent;

3. A lawful object; and,

4. A sufficient cause or consideration.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1550.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The Compassionate Use Act of 1996, an initiative measure enacted by the approval of Proposition 215 at the November 5, 1996, statewide general election, authorized the use of marijuana for medical purposes in this state.

(2) The Legislature passed the Medical Cannabis Regulation and Safety Act, formerly Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 19300) of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code, to regulate and license medical cannabis in the state.

(3) The Control, Regulate and Tax Adult Use of Marijuana Act (AUMA), an initiative measure enacted by the approval of Proposition 64 at the November 8, 2016, statewide general election, authorized the consumption of nonmedical marijuana by persons over 21 years of age and provided for the licensure and regulation of certain commercial nonmedical marijuana activities in this state.

(4) The Legislature passed the Medicinal and Adult-Use Cannabis Regulation and Safety Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code) to consolidate the licensure and regulation of certain commercial activities with
respect to medicinal cannabis and nonmedical marijuana, now known as adult-use cannabis.

(b) Notwithstanding any law, including, but not limited to, Sections 1550, 1667, and 1668 and federal law, commercial activity relating to medicinal cannabis or adult-use cannabis conducted in compliance with California law and any applicable local standards, requirements, and regulations shall be deemed to be all of the following:

(1) A lawful object of a contract.

(2) Not contrary to, an express provision of law, any policy of express law, or good morals.

(3) Not against public policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 35.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Parties [1556. - 1559.]

1556.

All persons are capable of contracting, except minors, persons of unsound mind, and persons deprived of civil rights.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1557.

(a) The capacity of a minor to contract is governed by Division 11 (commencing with Section 6500) of the Family Code.

(b) The capacity of a person of unsound mind to contract is governed by Part 1 (commencing with Section 38) of Division 1.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 163, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 161 of Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------

1558.

It is essential to the validity of a contract, not only that the parties should exist, but that it should be possible to identify them.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1559.

A contract, made expressly for the benefit of a third person, may be enforced by him at any time before the parties thereto rescind it.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Consent [1565. - 1590.]

1565.

The consent of the parties to a contract must be:

1. Free;

2. Mutual; and,

3. Communicated by each to the other.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1566.

A consent which is not free is nevertheless not absolutely void, but may be rescinded by the parties, in the manner prescribed by the Chapter on Rescission.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1567.

An apparent consent is not real or free when obtained through:

1. Duress;
